Utah statutes.
53-13-114.   Off-duty peace officer working as a security officer.

A peace officer may engage in off-duty employment as a security officer under Section 58-63-304 only if:

(1)  the law enforcement agency employing the peace officer:

(a)  has a written policy regarding peace officer employees working while off-duty as security officers; and

(b)  the policy under Subsection (1)(a) is:

(i)  posted and publicly available on the appropriate city, county, or state website; or

(ii)  posted on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701 if the law enforcement agency does not have access to a website under Subsection (1)(b)(i).

(2)  the agency's chief administrative officer, or that officer's designee, provides written authorization for an off-duty peace officer to work as a security officer; and

(3)  the business or entity employing the off-duty peace officer to work as a security officer complies with state and federal income reporting and withholding requirements regarding the off-duty officer's wages.

